Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 6 Gifts for the Blind

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Health § 1 et seq.; 40A Am. Jur. 2d Hospitals and Asylums § 1 et seq.

81 C.J.S. Social Security and Public Welfare §§ 193 to 198.

§ 25-6-101.
Authority of state to receive property; maintenance; sale and investment of proceeds.

The state may receive gifts, devises, bequests, deeds and other conveyances of property of any kind for the benefit of the blind citizens of Wyoming.

The property received shall be cared for and may be sold and the proceeds invested for the benefit of the visually handicapped citizens of Wyoming. The state department of education shall act for the state as the custodian of all property received under this section and shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the property and all proceeds for the benefit of the visually handicapped citizens of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 47, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-469; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-701; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 153, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1992, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to welfare provisions generally, see title 42.